Utah statutes.
70C-1-301.   Interpretation consistent with federal law.
Except as otherwise defined, all definitions or terms used in this title have
the same meaning as when used in the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act,
15 U.S.C.  Sections 1601 through 1677, as amended, and its implementing
Regulation Z.
